California, session 20252026, AB2643.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 742 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:742. (a) Any A person or other entity that provides coverage in this state for medical, surgical, chiropractic, physical therapy, speech pathology, audiology, professional mental health, dental, hospital, or optometric services, whether this coverage is by direct payment, reimbursement, or otherwise, and that enters into an arrangement or contract with, or underwrites, a preferred provider organization or arrangement subject to Section 10133 is subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of Insurance.(b) Any A person or entity subject to regulation under Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall not be subject to this section.